Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. JUDGES

CHAPTER 38. JUDICIAL DONATION TRUST FUNDS

Sec. 38.001. ESTABLISHMENT OF TRUST FUNDS. (a) The governing body of a municipality or the commissioners court of a county may establish a judicial donation trust fund as a separate account held outside the municipal or county treasury to be used in accordance with this chapter.

(b) The governing body of a municipality or the commissioners court of a county may accept a gift, grant, donation, or other consideration from a public or private source that is designated for the judicial donation trust fund.

(c) Money received under Subsection (b) shall be deposited in the judicial donation trust fund and may only be disbursed in accordance with this chapter.

(d) Interest and income from the assets of the judicial donation trust fund shall be credited to and deposited in the trust fund.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (H.B. 2398), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 36.001 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(10), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 38.002. PROCEDURES AND ELIGIBILITY. The governing body of a municipality or the commissioners court of a county shall:

(1) adopt the procedures necessary to receive and disburse money from the judicial donation trust fund under this chapter; and

(2) establish eligibility requirements for disbursement of money under this chapter to assist needy children or families who appear before a county, justice, or municipal court for a criminal offense or truant conduct, as applicable, by providing money for resources and services that eliminate barriers to school attendance or that seek to prevent criminal behavior.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (H.B. 2398), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 36.002 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(10), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 38.003. USE OF FUNDS IN ACCOUNT. (a) The judge of a county, justice, or municipal court, in accordance with Section 38.002, may award money from a judicial donation trust fund established under Section 38.001 to eligible children or families who appear before the court for a truancy violation or in another misdemeanor offense proceeding before the court.

(b) A judge of a county, justice, or municipal court may order the municipal or county treasurer to issue payment from the judicial donation trust fund for money awarded under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (H.B. 2398), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 36.003 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(10), eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.002(8), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 425 (H.B. 1819), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.